Washington statutes.
RCW 18.160.120

Infractions—Failure to obtain certificate of competency—Fines.

(1) A fire protection sprinkler system contractor found to have committed an infraction under this chapter as defined in rule under RCW 18.160.030(2)(b)(iii) shall be assessed a fine of not less than $300 and not more than $7,500 for the first infraction, a fine of not less than $400 and not more than $10,000 for a second infraction by the same contractor, and a fine of not less than $1,000 and not more than $15,000 for the third and any subsequent infractions by the same contractor.

(2) A fire protection sprinkler system contractor who fails to obtain a certificate of competency under RCW 18.160.040 shall be assessed a fine of not less than $1,500 and not more than $7,500 for the first infraction, and a fine of not less than $2,500 and not more than $10,000 for a second infraction by the same contractor, and a fine of not less than $5,000 and not more than $25,000 for the third and any subsequent infractions by the same contractor.

(3) All fines collected under this section shall be deposited into the fire protection compliance account.

[ 2023 c 329 s 3; 2003 c 74 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 329: See note following RCW 18.160.030.